Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-5,100
Pupil; attend school in adjoining state; application; procedure; authorization, when.

Upon receipt of an application pursuant to section 79-599, the school board or board of education shall inquire of the proposed receiving district if it is willing to receive the pupil. If the proposed receiving district is willing to do so, the school which the pupil would attend is accredited, and the conditions of section 79-5,101 have been met, the board may authorize such attendance.

Laws 1971, LB 469, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,106.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 353.